Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2224.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 13 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER CRETURN ON EQUITYSec.1380. Definitions.1381. Default authorized return on equity.1382. Competitive equity auction.1383. Annual reporting and transparency.1384. Applicability to State-jurisdictional rate base.<--123456789101112131415161718 1385. Applicability to ratemaking.§ 1380. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"10-year treasury." The market yield on United States Treasury securities at 10-year constant maturity, quoted on an investment basis, as reported by the Federal Reserve System."Auction-clearing return." The uniform rate of return established as the clearing price in a competitive equity auction conducted under section 1382(e)."Auction equity interest." The following:(1) An economic interest issued under a competitive equity auction under section 1382 (relating to competitive equity auction). An auction equity interest represents participation in the financial performance of a specific regulated service, which carries the auction-clearing return as adjusted under section 1382(c), and is distinct from the covered utility's base common stock. The following shall apply to an auction equity interest:(i) The authorized return and financial performance of an auction equity interest shall be determined solely by reference to the regulated service to which it relates and shall not be affected by the financial performance of, or returns applicable to, any other regulated service or any activity of the covered utility not subject to the jurisdiction of the commission.(ii) Except if auction equity interests are issued by a regulated service corporation established under section 1382(l), auction equity interests issued directly 20260HB2224PN3646 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the covered utility are obligations of the covered utility and may be subject to all risks applicable to the covered utility generally, including the risk of insolvency or bankruptcy of the covered utility.(iii) If the covered utility has established a regulated service corporation and regulated service LLC under section 1382, auction equity interests shall be issued by the regulated service corporation rather than by the covered utility itself.(2) As used in this definition, the term "covered utility's base common stock" shall mean the stock of the regulated service corporation retained by the covered utility."Authorized return on equity." The rate of return on common equity authorized by the commission for ratemaking purposes."Competitive equity auction." A process overseen by the commission in accordance with this subchapter that provides a market-based determination of the cost of equity for a covered utility."Cost of equity." The minimum rate of return necessary to attract equity capital to invest in a specific regulated service."Covered utility." An investor-owned electric distribution company, natural gas distribution company or water or wastewater public utilities regulated by the commission."Default authorized return." The authorized return on equity determined under section 1381 (relating to default authorized return on equity)."Rate period." The time period in which a covered utility collects rates that are authorized and approved by the 20260HB2224PN3646 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission."Regulated service." A service provided by a covered utility for which the commission determines an authorized return on equity. If a covered utility provides more than one category of service subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, each category shall be treated as a separate regulated service for purposes of this subchapter and consistent with the property segregation requirements of section 1305 (relating to advance payment of rates; interest on deposits), unless the commission determines that consolidated treatment is appropriate."Regulated service corporation." A corporation organized under the laws of any state, formed or designated by a covered utility under section 1382(l) that:(1) Is treated as a corporation for Federal income tax purposes.(2) Conducts no activities other than holding a membership interest in a regulated service LLC and serving as the issuer of auction equity interests for the regulated service associated with that regulated service LLC."Regulated service LLC." A limited liability company that is a wholly owned subsidiary of a regulated service corporation, formed or designated under section 1382(l), to hold assets, rights, franchises and obligations associated with a regulated service. A regulated service LLC shall be treated as a disregarded entity for Federal income tax purposes.§ 1381. Default authorized return on equity.(a) Default authorized return.--Unless an authorized return on equity is established under section 1382 (relating to competitive equity auction), the commission shall set the authorized return on a covered utility's common equity equal to 20260HB2224PN3646 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the sum of the 10-year treasury and 2%.(b) Annual reset.--The default authorized return shall be reset annually as of January 1 of each year to reflect the average of the 10-year treasury rate on the 60 business days immediately prior to January 1 of that year.(c) Alternative benchmark.--If publication of the 10-year treasury is ceased or interrupted, the commission shall identify and use for the calculation the alternative benchmark the commission determines to be the best substitute for carrying out the purposes of this section.(d) Burden of proof.--The burden of demonstrating that the default authorized return on equity is insufficient to attract capital shall be exclusively with the covered utility. The default authorized return shall be presumed just and reasonable unless rebutted through the competitive equity auction process specified in section 1382.(e) Initial rate period.--For a rate period commencing between the effective date of this subsection and the first reset date under subsection (b), the 10-year treasury component shall be determined using the averaging methodology prescribed in subsection (b) and applied to the 60 business days immediately preceding the effective date of this subsection.(f) Rate adjustment.--(1) If the authorized return on equity for a regulated service changes under this section or section 1382, the commission shall adjust the rates applicable to the regulated service to reflect the new authorized return on equity.(2) The adjustment shall be implemented through the mechanism the commission determines to be most expedient, which may include a surcharge or credit applied to existing 20260HB2224PN3646 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tariffs, an automatic rate adjustment mechanism or incorporation into the covered utility's next general rate proceeding.(3) The commission shall implement an adjustment no later than 90 days after the change in authorized return on equity takes effect.(g) Risk insurance.--Nothing in this subchapter shall preclude a covered utility from procuring third-party insurance to hedge material idiosyncratic risks, with the cost of the insurance recoverable in rates as an operating expense subject to the commission's determination of prudence.(h) Performance-based ratemaking.--(1) Nothing in this subchapter shall preclude the commission from establishing or maintaining a performance-based ratemaking plan for a covered utility if a plan is designed for the expected value of performance-based adjustments to the authorized return on equity to be neutral. (2) The performance-based ratemaking plan may not permit the aggregate effect of performance-based adjustments to increase the covered utility's realized return on equity for a regulated service by more than two percentage points above the authorized return on equity for that regulated service as determined under this subchapter.(3) For purposes of this subsection, the term "performance-based ratemaking plan" means a plan, mechanism or order that adjusts the authorized return on equity of a covered utility based on measured utility performance against specified benchmarks. The term does not include revenue decoupling mechanisms, formula rate plans or other mechanisms that operate on revenue, cost recovery or rate design without 20260HB2224PN3646 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adjusting the authorized return on equity.(i) Interaction with alternative ratemaking plans.--(1) An alternative ratemaking plan approved by the commission under section 1330 (relating to alternative ratemaking for utilities) which is in effect as of the effective date of this paragraph shall remain in effect in accordance with the plan's terms, unless a component of the plan that determines, adjusts or is calculated by reference to the authorized return on equity is recalculated using the authorized return on equity upon the next scheduled adjustment or reset of the component, as determined by the commission under this subchapter.(2) Non-return-on-equity components of a plan, including decoupling mechanisms, revenue-per-customer caps, price cap mechanisms and any distribution system improvement charge approved under section 1353 (relating to distribution system improvement charge) without limitation, shall not be affected by this subchapter.(3) An alternative ratemaking plan filed with the commission under section 1330 on or after the effective date of this paragraph shall incorporate the authorized return on equity as determined by the commission under this subchapter.(4) The commission may not approve a plan that permits a return on equity that is greater than the authorized return on equity determined by the commission.(5) Nothing in this subsection shall limit the authority of the commission to approve or maintain a distribution system improvement charge under section 1353 if the return component of the charge is calculated using the authorized return on equity determined by the commission under this 20260HB2224PN3646 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subchapter.(j) Initial implementation.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, title or prior order of the commission, the default authorized return on equity established under this section shall apply to each regulated service of a covered utility immediately upon the effective date of this paragraph, regardless of whether a rate proceeding under section 1308(d) (relating to voluntary changes in rates) is pending and when a rate proceeding was last concluded.(2) A rate component reflecting or implicitly permitting an authorized return on equity greater than the default authorized return established under this section may no longer be considered just and reasonable as of the effective date of this paragraph, except to the extent established through a competitive equity auction conducted under section 1382. To implement this subsection, the commission shall:(i) No later than 60 days after the effective date of this subparagraph, issue an order for each covered utility setting the authorized return on equity for each of its regulated services to the default authorized return determined under subsection (a), as adjusted under subsection (e) for the initial rate period.(ii) No later than 120 days after the effective date of this subparagraph, implement corresponding adjustments to customer rates, applying the mechanism the commission determines to be most expedient under subsection (f), which may include a surcharge or credit applied to existing tariffs or an automatic rate adjustment mechanism and which shall not require the initiation of a 20260HB2224PN3646 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 base rate proceeding under section 1308(d).(iii) Implement a true-up adjustment for the period commencing on the effective date of this subparagraph and ending on the date adjusted rates take effect, calculated as the difference between the revenue actually collected by the covered utility during the period and the revenue that would have been collected during the period had the default authorized return been reflected in rates throughout, with interest accruing at the default authorized return calculated from the midpoint of the period.(3) A covered utility that believes the default authorized return is insufficient to attract capital may, at any time following the effective date of this paragraph, petition the commission for a competitive equity auction under section 1382(a). The pendency of a petition shall not delay or suspend the implementation required by this subsection.(4) Nothing under this subsection shall be construed to disturb a non-return-on-equity component of a rate currently in effect, including the authorized capital structure or the cost of debt, except to the extent that the components must be adjusted as a mathematical consequence of the change in authorized return on equity required by this subsection.(k) Rate base.--(1) For purposes of determining the authorized return on equity for a regulated service of a covered utility under this subchapter, whether the return is determined under this section or under a competitive equity auction under section 1382, the commission shall determine a rate base to reflect 20260HB2224PN3646 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the full value of all assets prudently invested by or on behalf of the covered utility for the benefit of the regulated service, including construction work in progress and net of accumulated depreciation.(2) Reductions to a rate base shall solely be for capital that is not supplied by investors, which shall be limited to the following:(i) Accumulated deferred income taxes, to the extent that deferred tax liabilities exceed deferred tax assets. (ii) Customer deposits.(iii) Customer advances for construction.(3) The commission may not exclude from the rate base of a regulated service an asset on the basis that the asset has not yet been placed in service if the investment has been determined to be prudent and is being undertaken for the benefit of the regulated service.(4) This subsection shall be implemented on the same schedule as the initial implementation required by subsection (j), and the commission's 60-day order and 120-day rate adjustment under subsection (j) shall reflect both the change in authorized return on equity and the rate base determined in accordance with this subsection.§ 1382. Competitive equity auction.(a) Utility-initiated auction.--(1) If a covered utility believes that its cost of equity exceeds the default authorized return, the covered utility may petition the commission to oversee a competitive equity auction.(2) If the covered utility fails to take all necessary steps to facilitate the competitive equity auction based on 20260HB2224PN3646 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the timeline and procedures determined by the commission, the petition shall be deemed withdrawn and the covered utility is deemed to have accepted the default authorized return.(3) A petition under paragraph (1) shall be filed no later than 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph or the most recent reset of the default authorized return under subsection (b), whichever is later.(4) Upon certification of the auction results by the commission, the auction-clearing return shall become the authorized return on equity for the regulated service, and the commission shall adjust customer rates in accordance with section 1381(f) (relating to default authorized return on equity) no later than 90 days after the certification.(5) The commission shall implement a true-up adjustment under this subsection that is calculated as the difference between the revenue actually collected by the covered utility during the period from the filing of the petition through the date on which adjusted rates take effect and the revenue that would have been collected during that period had the auction-clearing return been reflected in rates throughout. The interest on the difference shall accrue at the auction-clearing return and be calculated from the midpoint of the period.(6) An adjustment to customer rates required by the reset of the default authorized return under section 1381(b) shall be implemented in accordance with section 1381(f) independently of an auction petition, and the true-up adjustment under paragraph (5) shall apply only to the period commencing on the date of the petition under paragraph (1).(b) Commission-initiated auction.--20260HB2224PN3646 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The commission may, on its own motion or upon petition by the Office of Consumer Advocate, order that a competitive equity auction be conducted for a covered utility if the commission finds reasonable cause to believe that the default authorized return materially exceeds the covered utility's cost of equity for a regulated service.(2) An auction initiated by the commission under this subsection may be ordered no earlier than 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph or the most recent reset of the default authorized return under section 1381(b), whichever is later, and no later than 60 days after the reset.(3) Upon certification of the auction results, the auction-clearing return shall become the authorized return on equity for the regulated service, and the commission shall adjust customer rates in accordance with section 1381(f) no later than 90 days after the certification.(4) The commission shall implement a true-up adjustment under this subsection that is calculated as the difference between the revenue actually collected by the covered utility during the period from January 1 of the year in which the auction is conducted through the date on which adjusted rates take effect and the revenue that would have been collected during that period had the auction-clearing return been reflected in rates throughout. The interest on the difference shall accrue at the auction-clearing return and be calculated from the midpoint of the period.(5) If a covered utility fails to take all steps required to facilitate an auction ordered under this subsection on the timeline prescribed by the commission, the 20260HB2224PN3646 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 default authorized return for that regulated service shall be reduced by 0.10 percentage points beginning on the date of the failure and continuing until the covered utility has complied with this subsection.(6) If the covered utility fails to facilitate a subsequent commission-initiated auction for the same regulated service, the reduction shall be cumulative.(7) Upon compliance with this subsection, a reduction under this subsection shall cease to apply prospectively and no retroactive adjustment shall be made for any period during which the reduction was in effect.(c) Duration and effect.--(1) Holders of auction equity interests issued at an auction under this section shall receive the auction-clearing return for the full duration of the interests. The auction-clearing return shall be adjusted for differences between realized and anticipated profits in a manner determined by the commission's order issued under this section.(2) The rate of return under paragraph (1), whether greater or less than the default authorized return, shall determine the authorized return on equity for the regulated service in accordance with subsection (d), until the following January 1, at which time the covered utility may elect that the default authorized return shall apply to the covered utility's common equity in the regulated service.(3) An election made under paragraph (2) shall not affect the return applicable to outstanding auction equity interests, which shall continue to receive the auction-clearing return for the full duration of the interests. Following an election, the authorized return on equity for 20260HB2224PN3646 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the regulated service shall be determined in accordance with subsection (d).(d) Multiple auctions.--(1) Where different equity interests in a regulated service bear different authorized rates of return, either for multiple auctions being conducted at different times or the covered utility has elected that the default authorized return shall apply to the covered utility's common equity under subsection (c), the authorized return on equity for the regulated service shall be the weighted average of the return applicable to each equity interest, which shall be weighted by its outstanding equity amount.(2) For the purposes under paragraph (2), the covered utility's common equity shall bear the auction-clearing return established in the most recent auction or the default authorized return following an election under subsection (c). If no auction equity interests remain outstanding, the default authorized return shall apply to the full equity component of the regulated service.(e) Auction mechanism.--The commission shall oversee a sealed-bid competitive auction administered independently of the covered utility. The following shall apply:(1) The commission shall determine for each auction whether bids are to be expressed as an absolute number or as a premium to the 10-year treasury or another index, with the applicable interest rate to be reset periodically.(2) Qualified bidders shall bid the minimum target return on equity they require.(3) All bids shall be ranked in ascending order and the commission shall accept bids in that order until the total 20260HB2224PN3646 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amount of equity offered in the auction has been fully allocated.(4) All successful bidders shall receive the same rate of return, equal to the highest accepted bid.(5) If the aggregate amount bid at the clearing rate exceeds the remaining amount of equity to be allocated, the bids shall be accepted on a pro rata basis. For the avoidance of doubt, all bids submitted at returns below the clearing rate shall be accepted in full but a pro rata reduction shall only apply to bids submitted at the clearing rate itself.(6) The amount of equity to be offered within each auction shall be the greater of 2.5% of the equity component of the regulated service rate base and the lesser of $50,000,000 and 5% of the equity component of the regulated service rate base.(7) The commission shall certify the results of an auction if at least five qualified bidders submitted bids and the aggregate equity amount bid by all qualified bidders was at least 1.5 times the total equity amount offered in the auction.(8) If either threshold under paragraph (7) is not met in a utility-initiated auction under subsection (a), the auction result shall be certified if the auction-clearing return does not exceed the default authorized return by more than two percentage points but, if not exceeded, the auction result shall be void and the default authorized return shall be applied.(9) If either threshold under paragraph (7) is not met in a commission-initiated auction under subsection (b), the auction result shall be void and the default authorized 20260HB2224PN3646 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 return shall continue to apply.(10) In a commission-initiated auction under subsection (b), regardless of whether the participation thresholds are met, the auction result shall be binding only if the auction-clearing return is less than the default authorized return.(11) If the auction-clearing return equals or exceeds the default authorized return in a commission-initiated auction under subsection (b), the default authorized return shall continue to apply.(12) If the aggregate equity amount bid in an auction under subsection (a) or (b) is less than the total equity amount offered, the auction-clearing return shall apply to the equity amount actually subscribed and the default authorized return shall apply to the remainder, in which the authorized return on equity for the regulated service shall be determined in accordance with subsection (d).(f) Cost recovery.--All reasonable costs incurred by a covered utility in connection with a competitive equity auction under this section, including costs of any required securities registration or offering preparation, reasonable registration costs under subsection (g), reasonable management time allocable to the auction and professional fees, shall be treated as prudently incurred costs for ratemaking purposes and shall be recoverable in rates.(g) Commission authority and regulations.--The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement the competitive equity auction procedures under this section, which shall include the following:(1) An application process, eligibility criteria and other measures necessary to ensure that bidders are qualified 20260HB2224PN3646 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to participate in an auction.(2) Ongoing disclosure obligations applicable to the covered utility and to holders of auction equity interests.(3) Guidelines for an independent auction administrator to conduct an auction.(4) Determination of the duties and requisite expertise of the independent auction administrator.(5) Consumer protection standards.(6) Auction disclosure documentation which states that the depreciation and amortization schedule is subject to prospective adjustment in subsequent rate proceedings and may affect the timing of return of capital to holders of auction equity interests.(7) Requirements for the independent auction administrator to disclose to all qualified bidders prior to each auction the conditions in which the auction result will be binding, including whether the auction is utility-initiated or commission-initiated and the consequences thereof for bid acceptance.(8) The form and content of the disclosure required under subsection (l)(2).(h) Securities law compliance.--(1) The economic interests offered under this section may constitute securities within the meaning of the Securities Act of 1933 (48 Stat. 74, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.), as amended, and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (48 Stat. 881, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.), as amended, and shall be subject to the registration requirements under section 1901 (relating to registration of securities to be issued or assumed).20260HB2224PN3646 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Each auction under this section shall be structured to qualify for an available exemption from registration under Federal securities law. Permissible exemptions may include limiting the offering to accredited investors under Rule 506 of Regulation D under the Securities Act of 1933 or conducting an intrastate offering exempt under section 3(a)(11) of the Securities Act of 1933 and applicable rules under the Securities Act of 1933.(3) The commission may, in its discretion, direct that a specific auction be conducted on a registered basis if the commission determines, based on the expected size of the offering and an analysis of anticipated investor demand, the following:(i) The expected reduction in the auction-clearing return attributable to broader investor participation enabled by registration is reasonably expected to outweigh the costs and delays of the registration process.(ii) The auction will not be delayed by more than 30 days beyond the timeline that would apply to an exempt offering.(4) Any direction by the commission to conduct an auction on a registered basis shall be issued by the commission sufficiently in advance of the covered utility's auction petition to permit timely registration.(5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to confer upon the commission any authority to regulate securities except as expressly provided in this subsection.(i) Instrument design.--(1) A covered utility may not be required to offer its 20260HB2224PN3646 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 common stock for sale in the auction, but the auction equity interests offered shall, as approved by the commission, provide prospective investors with the following:(i) Economically equivalent position to that of the covered utility's equity interest in the regulated service which may consist of the covered utility's common stock where auction equity interests are issued directly by the covered utility or the covered utility's retained stock interest in the regulated service corporation where the interests are issued by a regulated service corporation.(ii) Adequate protections against dilution or impairment of value through related-party transactions or other transfers involving the corporation's parent holding company.(iii) If the covered utility's realized profits of the regulated service in each period equal those embedded by the commission in the rates approved to achieve the authorized return on equity, prospective periodic distributions calibrated for holders of auction equity interests to realize an internal rate of return equal to the auction-clearing return which accounts for periodic distributions and any return of equity capital over the life of the interests.(iv) A stated initial equity amount per auction equity interest equal to the purchase price paid by the winning bidder in the auction, which shall be an equity amount to be returned to holders over the life of the interests at a rate and on a schedule consistent with the commission's treatment of rate base depreciation and 20260HB2224PN3646 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amortization for the regulated service for ratemaking purposes. If the equity component of the regulated service rate base is reduced through depreciation and amortization, a commensurate portion of the initial equity amount shall be returned to holders.(v) A specification of the shortfalls and excesses in realized profits, as determined by the commission under paragraph (2).(2) The commission shall establish rules or promulgate regulations specifying the methods and calculations in which shortfalls and excesses in realized profits of the regulated service relative to the earnings embedded in approved rates are to be allocated between holders of auction equity interests and the covered utility's common equity, including the allocation methods in the event of multiple outstanding series of auction equity interests.(3) The commission's regulations governing an auction under this section shall specify the initial equity amount per auction equity interest, the formula for calculating periodic distributions by applying the auction-clearing return to the outstanding equity balance for each period and the schedule for return of equity capital. The commission shall ensure that holders of auction equity interests will realize an internal rate of return equal to the auction-clearing return if the covered utility's realized profits of the regulated service in each period equal those embedded in the rates approved to achieve the authorized return on equity.(4) Each series of auction equity interests under this subsection shall be redeemed at its book value currently in 20260HB2224PN3646 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effect until the earlier of 40 years from the date of issuance or the end of the first fiscal quarter in which the outstanding equity amount of such series is less than 5% of the initial equity amount at issuance.(5) The covered utility or regulated service corporation, as applicable, shall fund a redemption under paragraph (4), whether through retained earnings, a capital contribution from the covered utility's parent company or any other source of equity capital. Upon the redemption, the equity represented by the redeemed series shall revert to the covered utility's common equity in the regulated service. The commission may defer the mandatory redemption date by not more than two years upon a demonstration by the covered utility that immediate redemption would materially impair its financial condition.(6) In the event of a merger, acquisition or change of control of the covered utility or, where applicable, the regulated service corporation, the successor entity shall assume all obligations to holders of outstanding auction equity interests on terms no less favorable than the terms in effect immediately prior to the transaction.(7) A transaction under paragraph (6) shall not be consummated without determination by the commission that the rights of holders of auction equity interests will be adequately preserved. The commission may require the terms of each series of auction equity interests to include a provision entitling holders to redemption at the book value then currently in effect upon any change of control, at the option of the holder.(8) In the event of the insolvency or dissolution of a 20260HB2224PN3646 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulated service corporation or regulated service LLC or the permanent discontinuation of the regulated service to which auction equity interests relate, outstanding auction equity interests shall participate in any distribution of remaining assets on a pari passu basis with the covered utility's common equity in the regulated service, in proportion to their respective outstanding equity amounts, in accordance with the commission's specifications under paragraph (2).(9) Nothing under paragraph (8) shall be construed to create a priority or preference in favor of, or against, holders of auction equity interests relative to the covered utility's common equity.(j) Participants.--(1) An auction under this section shall be open, at minimum, to all accredited investors as that term is defined under applicable Federal securities law.(2) Each qualified bidder shall, as a condition of participation, certify in writing to the independent auction administrator the following:(i) The bidder is submitting its bid based solely on the bidder's own assessment of the risk-adjusted financial return of the auction equity interest and not for the purpose or with the effect of artificially suppressing or inflating the auction-clearing return.(ii) The bidder is not acting in concert with any other bidder or with the covered utility or any of its affiliates with respect to the formulation of its bid.(3) A bidder that is a covered utility subject to cost-of-service regulation by a Federal or State regulatory authority, or a holding company that directly or indirectly 20260HB2224PN3646 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 controls the covered utility, shall not be eligible to participate as a bidder, except that the covered utility, its parent company and any affiliates may participate as bidders and shall be subject to any existing code of conduct policies for affiliate transactions and any further eligibility requirements established by the commission to prohibit inappropriate preferential treatment in the bidding process.(4) The exclusion under paragraph (3) shall not apply to a registered investment company, investment adviser or other institutional investor whose ownership of a covered utility is solely as a passive investor in diversified portfolios. Holdings by the institutional investors in auction equity interests issued under this subchapter shall not be counted toward an investment limitation applicable to ownership of the covered utility or the covered utility's common equity under applicable State law.(5) The commission shall establish rules or promulgate regulations to implement the exclusion and certification requirements under this subsection, including procedures for investigation and disqualification of bidders that submit false certifications or are found to have violated the prohibition on coordinated bidding.(k) Misconduct and risk attribution.--(1) If the commission or a court of competent jurisdiction has made a formal finding that a covered utility has engaged in unlawful or imprudent conduct which has materially increased the covered utility's cost of equity for a regulated service, the commission may exclude the portion of an increase in the authorized return on equity for the regulated service that is attributable to the conduct from 20260HB2224PN3646 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the return applicable to the covered utility's common equity. (2) An auction equity interest, whether issued before or after a finding under paragraph (1), shall not be subject to the exclusion under paragraph (1) and all auction equity interests shall continue to bear the auction-clearing return established in the auction in which the interests were issued without reduction on account of any exclusion under this subsection.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall limit the authority of the commission to impose penalties, disallowances or other remedies available under applicable law.(l) Regulated service corporation and regulated service LLC.--(1) A covered utility may, at any time before or after conducting a competitive equity auction, form a regulated service corporation and a regulated service LLC for a regulated service. The following shall apply:(i) The regulated service corporation formed shall be a wholly owned subsidiary of the covered utility, organized as a corporation under the laws of any state and treated as a corporation for Federal income tax purposes.(ii) The regulated service LLC shall be a wholly owned subsidiary of the regulated service corporation, organized as a limited liability company and treated as a disregarded entity for Federal income tax purposes.(iii) The regulated service LLC shall hold all material assets, rights, franchises and obligations associated with the regulated service.(iv) The regulated service corporation shall serve 20260HB2224PN3646 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as the issuer of auction equity interests for that regulated service.(v) The formation of a regulated service corporation and regulated service LLC shall not be a prerequisite to conduct an auction under this section.(vi) The absence of the entities shall not impair the validity of auction equity interests issued by the covered utility.(2) In a competitive equity auction conducted prior to a regulated service corporation and regulated service LLC being established, the commission shall require the covered utility to disclose to all qualified bidders that auction equity interests are being issued as direct obligations of the covered utility and are subject to the risks of any insolvency, bankruptcy or restructuring proceedings affecting the covered utility or the covered utility's affiliates.(3) The commission shall require each covered utility to ensure that all long-term indebtedness with a stated maturity greater than one year issued or incurred on or after the effective date of this paragraph, whether in the form of bonds, notes, debentures or otherwise, includes a covenant expressly permitting the covered utility to transfer the assets, franchises, rights and obligations associated with each regulated service to a regulated service corporation or regulated service LLC without the transfer constituting a default, event of default or breach under the indebtedness.(4) The commission may not approve any long-term debt financing by a covered utility that does not include a covenant under paragraph (3).(5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 20260HB2224PN3646 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 require a covered utility to restructure, refinance or assign any indebtedness outstanding as of the effective date of this paragraph in advance of the formation of a regulated service LLC under paragraph (1).(6) Each covered utility that has not yet established a regulated service corporation and regulated service LLC shall use commercially reasonable efforts to do so by no later than five years after the effective date of this paragraph or five years after the date of the covered utility's first competitive equity auction, whichever is later. The commission may extend the period under this paragraph upon a showing by the covered utility of good cause, which may include the inability to obtain required bondholder or creditor consents despite commercially reasonable efforts.(7) Whenever a covered utility has established a regulated service corporation and regulated service LLC, each entity shall be structured and operated as a bankruptcy-remote special-purpose entity. The commission shall adopt or promulgate rules or regulations to ensure the compliance of a regulated service corporation and regulated service LLC, which shall include the following:(i) Maintenance of books of account, bank accounts and financial records separate from those of the covered utility and any affiliate.(ii) Prohibition on commingling of assets.(iii) Requirements for the organizational documents of the regulated service LLC to include at least one independent manager whose affirmative consent is required for a voluntary bankruptcy filing by the regulated service LLC or the regulated service corporation.20260HB2224PN3646 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) A covenant by the covered utility not to cause or encourage any involuntary bankruptcy filing against the regulated service corporation or the regulated service LLC.(v) Restrictions on indebtedness of the regulated service corporation and the regulated service LLC unless approved by the commission.(8) The regulated service corporation may not conduct activities other than holding a membership interest in the regulated service LLC and serving as the issuer of auction equity interests. The corporation may not hold any assets other than the corporation's membership interest in the regulated service LLC and any cash or other assets incidental thereto.(9) Formation of both the regulated service corporation and the regulated service LLC shall require any approvals that may be required under applicable law, including any certificate of public convenience required under section 1102 (relating to enumeration of acts requiring certificate) for the transfer of utility assets or franchises, and any approval required under Chapter 21 (relating to relations with affiliated interests) for transactions between the covered utility and the entities.(10) If any assets are associated with more than one regulated service, the assets may be held by the regulated service LLC as co-owner with one or more other regulated service LLCs, with each LLC's interest proportionally allocated in a manner approved by the commission for ratemaking purposes.(11) For the capital structure and indebtedness of the 20260HB2224PN3646 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulated service LLC, the following apply:(i) Each regulated service LLC shall maintain a capital structure for the regulated service consistent with the capital structure authorized by the commission for ratemaking purposes, including debt and equity components.(ii) The equity component of the regulated service for the applicable authorized return on equity shall consist of the regulated service corporation's equity interest in the regulated service LLC which is funded by the proceeds of auction equity interests and the covered utility's retained interest.(iii) For ratemaking purposes, the interest on indebtedness of the regulated service LLC shall be treated as a cost of the regulated service.(iv) Upon formation of a regulated service LLC, the commission shall determine the portion of the covered utility's outstanding indebtedness that shall be allocated to the regulated service by applying the methodology used or to be used to allocate the covered utility's capital structure among regulated services for ratemaking purposes.(v) The regulated service LLC shall assume allocated indebtedness as primary obligor in which the covered utility shall provide an unconditional and irrevocable guaranty of all assumed indebtedness for the remaining term of each obligation.(vi) An assumption of allocated indebtedness shall not constitute a default, acceleration event, assignment or breach under the indebtedness, notwithstanding any 20260HB2224PN3646 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provision of the applicable instrument to the contrary.(vii) Upon formation, the regulated service LLC shall issue its own debt to finance the debt component of the regulated service LLC's capital structure which shall be secured by the regulated service assets held by the regulated service LLC.(viii) Unless the commission determines that a guaranty is necessary to obtain financing on terms consistent with public interest, the regulated service LLC's debt may not require a guaranty by the covered utility. If the commission determines that a guaranty is necessary, it shall be limited in scope and for a minimum duration to fulfill its obligations.(ix) For any period during which the covered utility guarantees indebtedness of a regulated service LLC, the covered utility shall be entitled to a guaranty fee in an amount and under the terms determined by the commission.(x) The rate base of the regulated service LLC shall be determined in accordance section 1381(k).(12) Upon establishment of a regulated service corporation and regulated service LLC, the regulated service corporation shall become the issuer of all subsequent auction equity interests for the applicable regulated service.(13) If it is determined to be in the public interest, the commission may authorize the covered utility to offer holders of outstanding auction equity interests the option to convert their interests to equivalent interests issued by the regulated service corporation.(14) Notwithstanding any other provision under this subsection, a covered utility shall not be required to form a 20260HB2224PN3646 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulated service corporation or regulated service LLC if the following apply:(i) The covered utility provides only one regulated service subject to the jurisdiction of the commission or if multiple categories of service have been determined by the commission to warrant consolidated treatment as a single regulated service.(ii) The covered utility does not engage in any material business activity other than the provision of that regulated service.(15) A covered utility that meets the requirements under paragraph (14) may issue auction equity interests directly, in which case all references under this subchapter to a regulated service corporation or regulated service LLC shall be construed as references to the covered utility when applicable.§ 1383. Annual reporting and transparency.(a) Reports.--Not later than January 15 of each year, the commission shall submit a report to the Governor, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee of the House of Representatives on the implementation of this subchapter. The annual report shall include all of the following:(1) Each covered utility's requested return on equity, rate of return and capitalization mix proposed as part of the covered utility's most recent base rate filing under section 1308(d) (relating to voluntary changes in rates), including the corresponding data for the preceding three base rate 20260HB2224PN3646 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filings.(2) The actual return on equity, rate of return and capitalization mixes authorized by the commission for each covered utility in the most recent three base rate proceedings.(3) The results of any competitive equity auctions conducted under this subchapter for the previous five calendar years.(4) An analysis of the impact on average customer rates resulting from implementation of this subchapter.(5) In clear and accessible language, a description of how authorized returns on equity have changed, reflect new circumstances or remained the same during the previous year.(6) All data used for calculations under this subchapter which is not publicly available, including an explanation on the necessity for using nonpublic data.(7) A summary of enforcement actions taken under this subchapter.(b) Public information.--The annual report under subsection (a) shall be made publicly available on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 1384. Applicability to State-jurisdictional rate base.This subchapter shall apply only to the portion of a covered utility's rate base that is subject to the ratemaking jurisdiction of the commission. Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to apply to, modify or otherwise affect the return on equity applicable to any facilities, assets or services for which the rate of return is determined by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or any other Federal regulatory authority. To the extent that a covered utility's rate base includes both 20260HB2224PN3646 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State-jurisdictional and federally jurisdictional components, the commission shall establish procedures to allocate the rate base between those components. The authorized return on equity determined under this subchapter shall be applied solely to the components subject to the commission's jurisdiction.§ 1385. Applicability to ratemaking.(a) Application.--This subchapter shall apply to each covered utility and each regulated service of a covered utility as of the effective date of this subsection regardless of whether a rate proceeding under section 1308(d) (relating to voluntary changes in rates) is pending and without regard to when the proceeding was last concluded.(b) Implementation.--The implementation timeline established under section 1381(j) (relating to default authorized return on equity) shall govern the commission's adjustment of customer rates to reflect the authorized return on equity required by this subchapter.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the initiation of a rate proceeding under section 1308(d) as a precondition to the application of this subchapter to a covered utility.(d) Duty to serve.--Nothing in this subchapter relieves a covered utility of its obligation and duty to serve customers through continued investment in maintaining a reliable infrastructure through continued investment and utilizing a qualified workforce to do so.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.SECTION 2. SECTION 1509 OF TITLE 66 IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 1509. BILLING PROCEDURES.(A) TIME PERIOD FOR PAYMENT WITHOUT PENALTY.--ALL BILLS 20260HB2224PN3646 - 32 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RENDERED BY A PUBLIC UTILITY AS DEFINED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(I), (II), (VI) OR (VII) OF THE DEFINITION OF "PUBLIC UTILITY" IN SECTION 102 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) TO ITS SERVICE CUSTOMERS, EXCEPT BILLS FOR INSTALLATION CHARGES, SHALL ALLOW AT LEAST 15 DAYS FOR NONRESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS AND 20 DAYS FOR RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS FROM THE DATE OF TRANSMITTAL OF THE BILL FOR PAYMENT WITHOUT INCURRING ANY LATE PAYMENT PENALTY CHARGES THEREFOR.(B) RECEIPT OF MONTHLY BILLS.--ALL CUSTOMERS SHALL BE PERMITTED TO RECEIVE BILLS MONTHLY AND SHALL BE NOTIFIED OF THEIR RIGHT THERETO.(C) ITEMIZATION.--ALL BILLS SHALL BE ITEMIZED TO SEPARATELY SHOW AMOUNTS FOR BASIC SERVICE, FEDERAL EXCISE TAXES, APPLICABLE STATE SALES AND GROSS RECEIPTS TAXES, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, FUEL ADJUSTMENT CHARGE, IF ANY, STATE TAX ADJUSTMENT CHARGE OR SUCH OTHER SIMILAR COMPONENTS OF THE TOTAL BILL AS THE COMMISSION MAY ORDER.(D) FUEL ADJUSTMENT CHARGE GENERALLY.--ANY ELECTRIC OR GAS PUBLIC UTILITY BILLING CUSTOMERS ON A BIMONTHLY OR QUARTERLY BASIS AND RENDERING INTERIM STATEMENTS OR BILLS EACH MONTH SHALL INCLUDE IN SUCH INTERIM STATEMENT OR BILL AN AMOUNT FOR THE FUEL ADJUSTMENT CHARGE BASED UPON ONE-HALF OF THE TOTAL EXPECTED BIMONTHLY KILOWATT HOUR OR CUBIC FOOT BILLING OR ONE-THIRD OF THE TOTAL EXPECTED QUARTERLY BILLING AND USING THE FUEL ADJUSTMENT CHARGE RATE APPLICABLE IN THE MONTH OF THE INTERIM STATEMENT OR BILL. AT THE TIME OF PREPARING THE BIMONTHLY OR QUARTERLY BILL, AN APPROPRIATE ADJUSTMENT SHALL BE MADE IN THE TOTAL FUEL ADJUSTMENT CHARGE BILLING FOR THE PERIOD.(E) CALCULATION OF FUEL ADJUSTMENT CHARGE.--ANY PUBLIC UTILITY RENDERING BILLS ON A BIMONTHLY BASIS OR QUARTERLY BASIS SHALL CALCULATE THE FUEL ADJUSTMENT CHARGE PER KILOWATT HOUR OR 20260HB2224PN3646 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CUBIC FOOT FOR THE ENTIRE PERIOD AS THE WEIGHTED AVERAGE OF THE TWO MONTHLY RATES OR THE THREE MONTHLY RATES WHICHEVER IS APPLICABLE.(F) PREVIOUSLY UNBILLED SERVICE.--(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2), A PUBLIC UTILITY AS DEFINED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OR (VII) OF THE DEFINITION OF "PUBLIC UTILITY" IN SECTION 102 MAY NOT RENDER A BILL FOR PREVIOUSLY UNBILLED SERVICE THAT HAS ACCRUED OUTSIDE OF THE PREVIOUS 12-MONTH PERIOD.(2) PARAGRAPH (1) DOES NOT APPLY TO A BILL THAT IS DELAYED AS A RESULT OF:(I) PROCEEDINGS OF THE COMMISSION OR A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION; OR(II) FRAUD, THEFT OR METER TAMPERING.SECTION 3. SECTION 2810(C) OF TITLE 66 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:§ 2810. REVENUE-NEUTRAL RECONCILIATION.* * *(C) RATE.--* * *(2.1) THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(I) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION OR SECTION 1101.2 OF THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, TO THE CONTRARY, THE RATE OF TAX ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE ZERO MILLS.(II) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 1101(B) OF THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, THE RATE OF TAX UNDER SECTION 1101(B) OF THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971 SHALL BE ZERO MILLS.20260HB2224PN3646 - 34 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (III) THE ENTIRE BENEFIT OF THE TAX ELIMINATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL DERIVE TO THE BENEFIT OF THE CONSUMER PURCHASING SERVICES FROM THE UTILITIES. THE BENEFIT SHALL BE PROVIDED IN THE FORM OF THE ELIMINATION OF THE STATE TAX SURCHARGE, WHICH SHALL BE CLEARLY REFLECTED IN EACH CONSUMER'S BILL. FAILURE TO PASS THROUGH THE ENTIRE BENEFIT OF THE TAX HOLIDAY TO THE CONSUMER SHALL SUBJECT THE PUBLIC UTILITY TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF AT LEAST $1,000, BUT NOT MORE THAN $5,000, AND ADDITIONAL RELIEF AS THE COURT MAY DEEM APPROPRIATE.* * *SECTION 4. FOR THE 2026-2027 FISCAL YEAR AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE TRANSFER OF MONEY FROM THE TAX UNDER ARTICLE XI OF THE ACT UNDER SECTION 6 OF THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 29, 2004 (P.L.1376, NO.178), KNOWN AS THE ALTERNATIVE FUELS INCENTIVE ACT, SHALL BE NO LESS THAN THE AMOUNT TRANSFERRED UNDER SECTION 6 OF THE ALTERNATIVE FUELS INCENTIVE ACT FOR THE 2025-2026 FISCAL YEAR.SECTION 5. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE FOLLOWING SHALL TAKE EFFECT JULY 1, 2026, OR IMMEDIATELY, WHICHEVER IS LATER:THE ADDITION OF 66 PA.C.S. § 2810(C)(2.1).SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT.(2) THE AMENDMENT OF 66 PA.C.S. § 1509 SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.(3) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20260HB2224PN3646 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627